District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Housing Investment Efficiency and Accountability Act of 2026.”
Sec. 2. Section 302 of the District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency Act, effective
March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-135; D.C. Official Code § 42-2703.02), is amended as follows:
(a) A new subsection (c) is added as follows:
“(c) The Agency shall serve as the District’s housing credit agency for purposes of
administering the Low Income Housing Tax Credit Program, as defined in in section
206(f)(2)(A), or any rental unit for which the housing provider receives tax credits pursuant to
the Low Income Housing Tax Credit Program, as defined in section 2(5) of the Low-Income
Housing Tax Credit Fund Act of 2004, effective April 8, 2005, (D.C. Law 15-299; D.C. Official
Code § 42-2853.01(5));”.
Sec. 3. Chapter 48 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as

follows:
(a) Section 47-4801 is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “Department” and inserting
the phrase “Agency” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “Department” means the
Department of Housing and Community Development, or its successor agency” and inserting the
phrase “Agency” means the District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency, or its successor
agency.
(3) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “Department” and inserting
the phrase “Agency” in its place.
(4) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the phrase “the Department is executed
on or after October 1, 2021, and with respect to which the Department issues an eligibility
statement” and inserting the phrase “the Agency is executed on or after October 1, 2021, and
with respect to which the Agency issues an eligibility statement” in its place.
(5) Paragraph (9) is amended by striking the phrase “Department” and inserting
the phrase “Agency” in its place.
(b) Section 4802 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase “Department” and inserting
the phrase “Agency” in its place.
(2) Subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase “Department” and inserting
the phrase “Agency” in its place.
(c) Section 47-4803 (b) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “Department, in a form

determined by the Department” and inserting the phrase “Agency, in a form determined by the
Agency” in its place.
(2) Subsection (b)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “Department” and
inserting the phrase “Agency” in its place.
(d) Section 47-4804 is amended by:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Department” and inserting
the phrase “Agency” in its place.
(2) Subsection (c)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “Department” and
inserting the phrase “Agency” in its place.
(e) Section 47-4805 of the DC Official Code is amended by striking the word
"Department" and inserting the phrase "District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency" in its
place.
(f) Section 47-4807 is amended by:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Department” and inserting
the phrase “Agency” in its place.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “Department” and inserting
the phrase “Agency” in its place.
(g) Section 47-4808 of the DC Official Code is amended by striking the word
"Department" and inserting the phrase "District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency" in its
place.
(h) Section 47-4809 of the DC Official Code is amended by striking the word
"Department" and inserting the phrase "District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency" in its
place.

(i) Section 47-4810 of the DC Official Code is amended by striking the word
"Department" and inserting the phrase "District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency" in its
place.
Sec. 4. Fiscal Impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.